Utah statutes.
17C-1-207.   Public entities may assist with urban renewal, economic
development, or community development project.
(1)  In order to assist and cooperate in the planning, undertaking,
construction, or operation of urban renewal, economic development, or
community development within the area in which it is authorized to act, a
public entity may:
(a) (i)  provide or cause to be furnished:
(A)  parks, playgrounds, or other recreational facilities;
(B)  community, educational, water, sewer, or drainage facilities; or
(C)  any other works which the public entity is otherwise empowered to
undertake;
(ii)  provide, furnish, dedicate, close, vacate, pave, install, grade,
regrade, plan, or replan streets, roads, roadways, alleys, sidewalks, or other
places;
(iii)  plan or replan, zone or rezone any part of a project area and make any
legal exceptions from building regulations and ordinances;
(iv)  purchase or legally invest in any of the bonds of an agency and exercise
all of the rights of any holder of the bonds;
(v)  enter into an agreement with another public entity concerning action to
be taken pursuant to any of the powers granted in this title;
(vi)  do any and all things necessary to aid or cooperate in the planning or
carrying out of the urban renewal, economic development, or community
development;
(vii)  in connection with the project area plan, become obligated to the
extent authorized and funds have been made available to make required
improvements or construct required structures; and
(viii)  lend, grant, or contribute funds to an agency for an urban renewal,
economic development, or community development project; and
(b) 15 days after posting public notice:
(i)  purchase or otherwise acquire property or lease property from an agency;
or
(ii)  sell, grant, convey, or otherwise dispose of the public entity's
property or lease the public entity's property to an agency.
(2)  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, an agreement under Subsection
(1)(a)(v) may extend over any period.
(3)  A grant or contribution of funds from a public entity to an agency is not
subject to the requirements of Section 10-8-2.
